Washington statutes.
RCW 43.392.010

Findings—Intent.

The legislature finds that in order to meet the statewide greenhouse gas emissions limits in RCW 70A.45.020 and 70A.45.050, the state must drastically reduce vehicle greenhouse gas emissions. A critical strategy to meet those goals is transitioning to zero emissions vehicles and this transition requires ongoing purposeful interagency coordination and cooperation. As such, it is the intent of the legislature to create a formal interagency council responsible for coordinating the state's transportation electrification efforts to ensure the state is leveraging state and federal resources to the best extent possible and to ensure zero emissions incentives, infrastructure, and opportunities are available and accessible to all Washingtonians.

The legislature further finds that in order to meet the statewide greenhouse gas emissions limits in the transportation sector of the economy, more resources must be directed toward achieving zero emissions transportation and transit, while continuing to relieve energy burdens that exist in overburdened communities.

[ 2022 c 182 s 427.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2022 c 182: See notes following RCW 70A.65.240.